District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.47

Continuance of suspension until judgment paid and proof given.

Such license, registration and nonresident’s operating privilege shall remain so suspended and shall not be renewed, nor shall any such license or registration be thereafter issued in the name of such person, including any such person not previously licensed, unless and until every such judgment is stayed, satisfied in full or to the extent hereinafter provided and until the said person gives proof of financial responsibility subject to the exemptions stated in §§ 50-1301.44, 50-1301.45, and 50-1301.50, except that if the right to enforce said judgment by docketing and revival, or by revival, shall have expired without such docketing and revival, or if the judgment creditor fails to file notice of the docketing and revival of his judgment with the Mayor, the suspension of the license or registration of the judgment debtor shall be terminated.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 132, ch. 222, § 47
Apr. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 1-133, title IV, § 401, 23 DCR 9697

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-447.
1973 Ed., § 40-463.